Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 50. Exchange of State Land.

Cross references. —

For reservations to which contracts for sale, lease or grant of state land and deed to state land, properties or interest in state land are subject, see
AS

38.05.125

.

For provisions authorizing an exchange with the federal government of certain Mental Health Trust land for certain United States Forest Service land if the chair of the board of trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority certifies that the conditions in sec. 6(a), ch. 22, SLA 2017, have been satisfied. The certification was made on January 4, 2019, and Chapter 22, SLA 2017, and the grant of the authority to complete the exchange took effect January 5, 2019.

Administrative Code. —

For land exchanges, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8.

Sec. 38.50.010.
Authorization and procedure for exchange of state land.

When it is in the best interest of the state, and subject to the requirements of this chapter and the notice provisions of AS

38.05.945

, the director may, with the consent of the commissioner, dispose of state land or interest in land, including the land estate, the mineral estate, or both, by exchanging it for land, interest in land, or other consideration.

Land or an interest in land exchanged must be of approximately equal value; however, the director may accept from or pay to a party to an exchange cash or other consideration to equalize the value of the property conveyed and received by the state. If the director determines that the property to be exchanged is not of approximately equal value or if the value of the property cannot be ascertained with reasonable certainty, the director may enter into an exchange with a finding that the value of the property received, together with the value of other public benefits, equals or exceeds the value of the property relinquished by the state.

Exchange procedures must comply with applicable statutes and regulations and follow the determination and review procedures provided under AS

38.05.035(e)

. The director may include in a patent or the written finding stipulations necessary to promote or protect the public interest.

If the value of the state land exchanged exceeds $5,000,000, or if the exchange is not of an approximately equal value, the director shall forward the proposed exchange to the legislature for review under AS

38.50.140

not later than 10 days after the convening of the next legislative session.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am §§ 5, 6 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For land exchanges, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, rewrote (a); and added (b), (c) and (d).

Sec. 38.50.020.
Value of properties exchanged.

History.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 38.50.030.
Parties.

The director may exchange land and interests in land with a government agency, organization, corporation, individual, or other person. At the beginning of discussions concerning a proposed exchange, the director shall require proof that each party to the negotiations is the owner of, or is legally entitled to, the property which the party desires to exchange and proof that a person acting as an agent for a principal has the authority to negotiate an exchange in behalf of the principal.

The director may negotiate an exchange involving more than one party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, in (b), deleted “; however, in order to ascertain whether the equal value requirements of this chapter have been met, the director shall consider only the land and other consideration which the state would convey and receive if the exchange were executed” following “The director may negotiate an exchange involving more than one party”.

Sec. 38.50.040.
Land subject to exchange.

History.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 38.50.050.
Conveyance of mineral rights.

Subject to the requirements of this chapter, the director is authorized to exchange mineral rights in state land to the extent that the conveyance is authorized by the state constitution and applicable federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, deleted the second sentence of the section, prohibiting separate exchange of surface estate and mineral rights with certain exceptions.

Sec. 38.50.060.
Reservations and covenants.

The director may include in any patent or other instrument issued under this chapter any reservations and covenants relating to the land which the director considers necessary to protect or promote the public interest.
Reservations and covenants may include, but are not limited to, those relating to access, environmental protection, and use or development rights.
The director may receive land which is subject to reservations and covenants if the director finds that the reservations and covenants are consistent with the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976)

Sec. 38.50.070.
Valid existing rights.

Conveyances made by the state under this chapter are subject to valid existing rights, including contracts, permits, leases, rights-of-way, and easements. Unless jurisdiction is waived, the appropriate state agency shall continue to administer valid existing rights, and revenue derived from the existing rights continue to accrue to the state until state land is conveyed under AS

38.50.150

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, in the first sentence, deleted “, but not limited to,” following “valid existing rights, including”; in the second sentence, substituted “, and revenue” for “as long as any revenues”, inserted “existing” following “derived from the”, substituted “continue to accrue to the state until state land is conveyed under AS

38.50.150

” for “are distributed as provided in the exchange agreement” at the end.

Sec. 38.50.080.
Prohibition against future consideration.

The director may not negotiate or enter into a land exchange agreement which requires the identification of land, interest in land, or other consideration, except for the performance of necessary survey work, at any time after the agreement is initially executed.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, repealed (b).

Sec. 38.50.090 — 38.50.110
Coordination with other state agencies; finding requirement as to alternatives; notice of proposed exchange.

History.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 38.50.120.
Public hearings.

For an exchange of state land having an appraised or estimated fair market value of more than $5,000,000, the director shall hold at least two public meetings before the exchange is submitted to the legislature for approval. Meetings under this subsection may be held telephonically, except at least one meeting shall be held in person in a municipality close to the state land proposed for exchange.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 74 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 10, 13 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For timber and logging requirements, see 11 AAC 71, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 9, 2016, in (a), deleted the first sentence, related to the number of public hearings which may be held, substituted “the director shall hold” for “there shall be”, substituted “two public meetings before the exchange is submitted to the legislature for approval. Meetings under this subsection may be held telephonically, except at least” for “three public hearings in”, substituted “meeting shall be held in person in a municipality” for “or more municipalities”; deleted “before it is submitted to the legislature for approval” at the end; repealed (b).

Sec. 38.50.130.
Report on proposed exchange.

History.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 57 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 38.50.140.
Legislative review.

Within 10 days after the convening of a regular legislative session, the governor shall transmit to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives any proposal for a land exchange required to be submitted to the legislature for approval under AS

38.50.010

that is scheduled to occur before the next legislative session. If exigent circumstances seriously affecting state interests so require, the governor may submit the proposed exchange to the legislature at another time. A finding of exigent circumstances shall be carefully documented in the letter of transmittal. The director is authorized to conclude a proposed exchange agreement upon approval by the legislature of the proposed exchange agreement. A decision by the legislature to disapprove a proposed exchange shall be accompanied by a recommendation to the governor with respect to future actions that the director should take concerning the exchange.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 75 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 11 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For legislative approval of a land exchange between the state and Alaska Hardrock, Inc. of land within or adjacent to Independence Mine State Historical Park, see secs. 1 and 2, ch. 91, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for legislative approval of a land exchange between the state and Gold Cord Development Corporation of land adjacent to Independence Mine State Historical Park, see §§ 1 and 2, ch. 25, SLA 2002 in the 2002 Temporary & Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, in the first sentence, substituted “38.50.010” for “38.50.020(a)”, made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 38.50.150.
Execution of exchange.

If a deed, contract of exchange, or other instrument of conveyance which the director receives to effectuate an exchange is properly executed, acknowledged, and authorized by the appropriate party, the director shall accept conveyance of title to the land and other property which the state is to receive as consideration, and shall issue a patent, contract of exchange, or other instrument of conveyance to the appropriate party for the property which the director is then obligated to convey.
Before acceptance by the director of a deed, contract of exchange, or other instrument, no action taken by the director or by any other state official creates a right against the state with respect to state land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976)

Sec. 38.50.160.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For land exchanges, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8.

Sec. 38.50.170.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless otherwise specified,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“director” means the director of the division of lands;

“state land” means all land, including shoreland, tideland, and submerged land or unsevered resources belonging to or acquired by the state excluding interests in land severed or constructively severed from the land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For director of division of lands, see AS

38.05.010

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, in (3), substituted “shoreland, tideland” for “shore, tide”.